test/src/morphology/N-piess_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - pieˊss: # Noun 'nest' - full paradigm
     pieˊss+N+Sg+Nom: pieˊss
     pieˊss+N+Sg+Gen: pieˊzz
     pieˊss+N+Sg+Acc: pieˊzz
     pieˊss+N+Sg+Ill: peässa
     pieˊss+N+Sg+Loc: pieˊzzest
     pieˊss+N+Sg+Com: pieˊzzin
     pieˊss+N+Sg+Ess: pieˊssen
     pieˊss+N+Sg+Par: pieˊssed
     pieˊss+N+Sg+Abe: pieˊzztää
     pieˊss+N+Pl+Nom: pieˊzz
     pieˊss+N+Pl+Gen: pieˊzzi
     pieˊss+N+Pl+Acc: pieˊzzid
     pieˊss+N+Pl+Ill: pieˊzzid
     pieˊss+N+Pl+Loc: pieˊzzin
     pieˊss+N+Pl+Com: pieˊzzivuiˊm
     pieˊss+N+Pl+Ess: pieˊssen
     pieˊss+N+Pl+Par: pieˊssed
     pieˊss+N+Pl+Abe: pieˊzzitää


     
     
